Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8302
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of sections 71-8301 to 71-8314, the definitions found in sections 71-8303 to 71-8307 are used.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 108.